test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-puuoraz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pūoraz: # Noun 178 'eng /est põrsas/fin' - full paradigm
     pūoraz+N+Sg+Nom: pūoraz
     pūoraz+N+Sg+Gen: pȯrzõ
     pūoraz+N+Sg+Par: pūorazt
     pūoraz+N+Sg+Dat: pȯrzõn
     pūoraz+N+Sg+Ins: pȯrzõks
     pūoraz+N+Sg+Ill: [pȯrzõ, pȯrzõz]
     pūoraz+N+Sg+Ela: pȯrzõst
     pūoraz+N+Pl+Nom: pȯrzõd
     pūoraz+N+Pl+Gen: pȯrzõd
     pūoraz+N+Pl+Par: pȯrzidi
     pūoraz+N+Pl+Dat: pȯrzõdõn
     pūoraz+N+Pl+Ins: pȯrzõdõks
     pūoraz+N+Pl+Ill: pȯrziž
     pūoraz+N+Pl+Ela: pȯrzist
